West Virginia, session 2026, SB288.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Insurance Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on April 16, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-12-37 of this code, relating to the Insurance Commissioner (fingerprinting requirements for applicants for insurance producer license and insurance adjuster license, 114 CSR 02A), is authorized.